Florida, session 2026, SB392.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 11 561.20, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 12 561.20âLimitation upon number of licenses issued.â 13 (2)(a)âThe limitation of the number of licenses as provided 14 in this section does not prohibit the issuance of a special 15 license to: 16 1.âAny bona fide hotel, motel, or motor court of not fewer 17 than 80 guest rooms in any county having a population of less 18 than 50,000 residents, and of not fewer than 100 guest rooms in 19 any county having a population of 50,000 residents or greater; 20 or any bona fide hotel or motel located in a historic structure, 21 as defined in s. 561.01(20), with fewer than 100 guest rooms 22 which derives at least 51 percent of its gross revenue from the 23 rental of hotel or motel rooms, which is licensed as a public 24 lodging establishment by the Division of Hotels and Restaurants; 25 provided, however, that a bona fide hotel or motel with no fewer 26 than 10 and no more than 25 guest rooms which is a historic 27 structure, as defined in s. 561.01(20), in a municipality that 28 on the effective date of this act has a population, according to 29 the University of Floridaâs Bureau of Economic and Business 30 Research Estimates of Population for 1998, of no fewer than 31 25,000 and no more than 35,000 residents and that is within a 32 constitutionally chartered county may be issued a special 33 license. This special license shall allow the sale and 34 consumption of alcoholic beverages only on the licensed premises 35 of the hotel or motel. In addition, the hotel or motel must 36 derive at least 60 percent of its gross revenue from the rental 37 of hotel or motel rooms and the sale of food and nonalcoholic 38 beverages; provided that this subparagraph shall supersede local 39 laws requiring a greater number of hotel rooms; 40 2.âAny condominium accommodation of which no fewer than 100 41 condominium units are wholly rentable to transients and which is 42 licensed under chapter 509, except that the license shall be 43 issued only to the person or corporation that operates the hotel 44 or motel operation and not to the association of condominium 45 owners; 46 3.âAny condominium accommodation of which no fewer than 50 47 condominium units are wholly rentable to transients, which is 48 licensed under chapter 509, and which is located in any county 49 having home rule under s. 10 or s. 11, Art. VIII of the State 50 Constitution of 1885, as amended, and incorporated by reference 51 in s. 6(e), Art. VIII of the State Constitution, except that the 52 license shall be issued only to the person or corporation that 53 operates the hotel or motel operation and not to the association 54 of condominium owners; 55 4.âA bona fide food service establishment that has a 56 minimum of 1,200 2,000 square feet of service area, is equipped 57 to serve meals to 80 120 persons at one time, has at least 80 58 120 physical seats available for patrons to use during operating 59 hours, holds itself out as a restaurant, and derives at least 51 60 percent of its gross food and beverage revenue from the sale of 61 food and nonalcoholic beverages during the first 120-day 62 operating period and the first 12-month operating period 63 thereafter. Subsequent audit timeframes must be based upon the 64 audit percentage established by the most recent audit and 65 conducted on a staggered scale as follows: level 1, 51 percent 66 to 60 percent, every year; level 2, 61 percent to 75 percent, 67 every 2 years; level 3, 76 percent to 90 percent, every 3 years; 68 and level 4, 91 percent to 100 percent, every 4 years. A 69 licensee under this subparagraph may sell or deliver alcoholic 70 beverages in a sealed container for off-premises consumption if 71 the sale or delivery is accompanied by the sale of food within 72 the same order. Such authorized sale or delivery includes wine 73 based and liquor-based beverages prepared by the licensee or its 74 employee and packaged in a container sealed by the licensee or 75 its employee. This subparagraph may not be construed to 76 authorize public food service establishments licensed under this 77 subparagraph to sell a bottle of distilled spirits sealed by a 78 manufacturer. Any sale or delivery of malt beverages must comply 79 with the container size, labeling, and filling requirements 80 imposed under s. 563.06. Any delivery of an alcoholic beverage 81 under this subparagraph must comply with s. 561.57. An alcoholic 82 beverage drink prepared by the vendor and sold or delivered for 83 consumption off the premises must be placed in a container 84 securely sealed by the licensee or its employees with an 85 unbroken seal that prevents the beverage from being immediately 86 consumed before removal from the premises. Such alcoholic 87 beverage also must be placed in a bag or other container that is 88 secured in such a manner that it is visibly apparent if the 89 container has been subsequently opened or tampered with, and a 90 dated receipt for the alcoholic beverage and food must be 91 provided by the licensee and attached to the bag or container. 92 If transported in a motor vehicle, an alcoholic beverage that is 93 not in a container sealed by the manufacturer must be placed in 94 a locked compartment, a locked trunk, or the area behind the 95 last upright seat of a motor vehicle. It is a violation of the 96 prohibition in s. 562.11 to allow any person under the age of 21 97 to deliver alcoholic beverages on behalf of a vendor. The vendor 98 or the agent or employee of the vendor must verify the age of 99 the person making the delivery of the alcoholic beverage before 100 allowing any person to take possession of an alcoholic beverage 101 for the purpose of making a delivery on behalf of a vendor under 102 this section. A food service establishment granted a special 103 license on or after January 1, 1958, pursuant to general or 104 special law may not operate as a package store and may not sell 105 intoxicating beverages under such license after the hours of 106 serving or consumption of food have elapsed. Failure by a 107 licensee to meet the required percentage of food and 108 nonalcoholic beverage gross revenues during the covered 109 operating period shall result in revocation of the license or 110 denial of the pending license application. A licensee whose 111 license is revoked or an applicant whose pending application is 112 denied, or any person required to qualify on the special license 113 application, is ineligible to have any interest in a subsequent 114 application for such a license for a period of 120 days after 115 the date of the final denial or revocation; 116 5.âAny caterer, deriving at least 51 percent of its gross 117 food and beverage revenue from the sale of food and nonalcoholic 118 beverages at each catered event, licensed by the Division of 119 Hotels and Restaurants under chapter 509. This subparagraph does 120 not apply to a culinary education program, as defined in s. 121 381.0072(2), which is licensed as a public food service 122 establishment by the Division of Hotels and Restaurants and 123 provides catering services. Notwithstanding any law to the 124 contrary, a licensee under this subparagraph shall sell or serve 125 alcoholic beverages only for consumption on the premises of a 126 catered event at which the licensee is also providing prepared 127 food, and shall prominently display its license at any catered 128 event at which the caterer is selling or serving alcoholic 129 beverages. A licensee under this subparagraph shall purchase all 130 alcoholic beverages it sells or serves at a catered event from a 131 vendor licensed under s. 563.02(1), s. 564.02(1), or licensed 132 under s. 565.02(1) subject to the limitation imposed in 133 subsection (1), as appropriate. A licensee under this 134 subparagraph may not store any alcoholic beverages to be sold or 135 served at a catered event. Any alcoholic beverages purchased by 136 a licensee under this subparagraph for a catered event that are 137 not used at that event must remain with the customer; provided 138 that if the vendor accepts unopened alcoholic beverages, the 139 licensee may return such alcoholic beverages to the vendor for a 140 credit or reimbursement. Regardless of the county or counties in 141 which the licensee operates, a licensee under this subparagraph 142 shall pay the annual state license tax set forth in s. 143 565.02(1)(b). A licensee under this subparagraph must maintain 144 for a period of 3 years all records and receipts for each 145 catered event, including all contracts, customersâ names, event 146 locations, event dates, food purchases and sales, alcoholic 147 beverage purchases and sales, nonalcoholic beverage purchases 148 and sales, and any other records required by the department by 149 rule to demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this 150 subparagraph. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any 151 vendor licensed under s. 565.02(1) subject to the limitation 152 imposed in subsection (1), may, without any additional licensure 153 under this subparagraph, serve or sell alcoholic beverages for 154 consumption on the premises of a catered event at which prepared 155 food is provided by a caterer licensed under chapter 509. If a 156 licensee under this subparagraph also possesses any other 157 license under the Beverage Law, the license issued under this 158 subparagraph may not authorize the holder to conduct activities 159 on the premises to which the other license or licenses apply 160 that would otherwise be prohibited by the terms of that license 161 or the Beverage Law. This section does not permit the licensee 162 to conduct activities that are otherwise prohibited by the 163 Beverage Law or local law. The Division of Alcoholic Beverages 164 and Tobacco is hereby authorized to adopt rules to administer 165 the license created in this subparagraph, to include rules 166 governing licensure, recordkeeping, and enforcement. The first 167 $300,000 in fees collected by the division each fiscal year 168 pursuant to this subparagraph shall be deposited in the 169 Department of Children and Familiesâ Operations and Maintenance 170 Trust Fund to be used only for alcohol and drug abuse education, 171 treatment, and prevention programs. The remainder of the fees 172 collected shall be deposited into the Hotel and Restaurant Trust 173 Fund created pursuant to s. 509.072; or 174 6.âA culinary education program as defined in s. 175 381.0072(2) which is licensed as a public food service 176 establishment by the Division of Hotels and Restaurants. 177 a.âThis special license shall allow the sale and 178 consumption of alcoholic beverages on the licensed premises of 179 the culinary education program. The culinary education program 180 shall specify designated areas in the facility where the 181 alcoholic beverages may be consumed at the time of application. 182 Alcoholic beverages sold for consumption on the premises may be 183 consumed only in areas designated under s. 561.01(11) and may 184 not be removed from the designated area. Such license shall be 185 applicable only in and for designated areas used by the culinary 186 education program. 187 b.âIf the culinary education program provides catering 188 services, this special license shall also allow the sale and 189 consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises of a catered 190 event at which the licensee is also providing prepared food. A 191 culinary education program that provides catering services is 192 not required to derive at least 51 percent of its gross revenue 193 from the sale of food and nonalcoholic beverages. 194 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a licensee that 195 provides catering services under this sub-subparagraph shall 196 prominently display its beverage license at any catered event at 197 which the caterer is selling or serving alcoholic beverages. 198 Regardless of the county or counties in which the licensee 199 operates, a licensee under this sub-subparagraph shall pay the 200 annual state license tax set forth in s. 565.02(1)(b). A 201 licensee under this sub-subparagraph must maintain for a period 202 of 3 years all records required by the department by rule to 203 demonstrate compliance with the requirements of this sub 204 subparagraph. 205 c.âIf a licensee under this subparagraph also possesses any 206 other license under the Beverage Law, the license issued under 207 this subparagraph does not authorize the holder to conduct 208 activities on the premises to which the other license or 209 licenses apply that would otherwise be prohibited by the terms 210 of that license or the Beverage Law. This subparagraph does not 211 permit the licensee to conduct activities that are otherwise 212 prohibited by the Beverage Law or local law. Any culinary 213 education program that holds a license to sell alcoholic 214 beverages shall comply with the age requirements set forth in 215 ss. 562.11(4), 562.111(2), and 562.13. 216 d.âThe Division of Alcoholic Beverages and Tobacco may 217 adopt rules to administer the license created in this 218 subparagraph, to include rules governing licensure, 219 recordkeeping, and enforcement. 220 e.âA license issued pursuant to this subparagraph does not 221 permit the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages by the package 222 for off-premises consumption. 223 224 However, any license heretofore issued to any such hotel, motel, 225 motor court, or restaurant or hereafter issued to any such 226 hotel, motel, or motor court, including a condominium 227 accommodation, under the general law may not be moved to a new 228 location, such license being valid only on the premises of such 229 hotel, motel, motor court, or restaurant. Licenses issued to 230 hotels, motels, motor courts, or restaurants under the general 231 law and held by such hotels, motels, motor courts, or 232 restaurants on May 24, 1947, shall be counted in the quota 233 limitation contained in subsection (1). Any license issued for 234 any hotel, motel, or motor court under this law shall be issued 235 only to the owner of the hotel, motel, or motor court or, in the 236 event the hotel, motel, or motor court is leased, to the lessee 237 of the hotel, motel, or motor court; and the license shall 238 remain in the name of the owner or lessee so long as the license 239 is in existence. Any special license now in existence heretofore 240 issued under this law cannot be renewed except in the name of 241 the owner of the hotel, motel, motor court, or restaurant or, in 242 the event the hotel, motel, motor court, or restaurant is 243 leased, in the name of the lessee of the hotel, motel, motor 244 court, or restaurant in which the license is located and must 245 remain in the name of the owner or lessee so long as the license 246 is in existence. Any license issued under this section shall be 247 marked âSpecial,â and nothing herein provided shall limit, 248 restrict, or prevent the issuance of a special license for any 249 restaurant or motel which shall hereafter meet the requirements 250 of the law existing immediately before the effective date of 251 this act, if construction of such restaurant has commenced 252 before the effective date of this act and is completed within 30 253 days thereafter, or if an application is on file for such 254 special license at the time this act takes effect; and any such 255 licenses issued under this proviso may be annually renewed as 256 now provided by law. Nothing herein prevents an application for 257 transfer of a license to a bona fide purchaser of any hotel, 258 motel, motor court, or restaurant by the purchaser of such 259 facility or the transfer of such license pursuant to law. 260 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.